District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
20 act may be cited as the "Poplar Point Acquisition and Disposition Approval Act of 2026".
21 Sec. 2. Definitions.
22 For the purposes of this act, the term:
23 (1) "Act" means An Act Authorizing the sale of certain real estate in the District
24 of Columbia no longer required for public purposes, approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat. 1211;
25 D.C. Official Code§ 10-801 et seq.).
26 (2) "Developer l" means RB WNY LLC, a Delaware limited liability company,
27 and its affiliates, successors, or assigns as approved by the Mayor.
28 (3) "Developer 2" means CQ Metro Land LLC, a Delaware limited liability
29 company, and its affiliates, successors, or assigns as approved by the Mayor.

30 (4) “Developer 1’s JBAB Property” means approximately 32 acres of the north
31 parcel of land within Joint Base Anacostia Bolling (“JBAB”) which Developer 1 has an option to
32 purchase from the Navy.
33 (5) “Navy” means the Department of the Navy.
34 (6) “Parcel A” means the 12-acre portion of the Developer 1’s JBAB Property for
35 the relocation of the NPS Facilities from Poplar Point, which will be further defined in the
36 Transaction Documents.
37 (7) “Parcel B” means the 12.5 acres of Poplar Point generally proximate to the
38 Bridge District, which will be further defined in the Transaction Documents.
39 (8) “Parcel 7” means Square 5860, Lot 1041, which is owned by Developer 2.
40 (9) “Poplar Point” means the parcel of land in the District of Columbia which is
41 owned by the United States and is defined in the Federal and District of Columbia Government
42 Real Property Act of 2006, approved December 15, 2006 (120 Stat. 2711) (“Federal Act”).
43 (10) “Road Swap Parcel” means a 1/2 acre parcel of real property located at
44 Poplar Point, which will be further defined in the Transaction Documents.
45 (11) “Term Sheet” means the term sheet dated September 9, 2026 executed by
46 Developer 1, Developer 2, and the District of Columbia, acting by and through the Office of the
47 Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development, and submitted with this act.
48 (12) “Transaction Documents” mean any documents entered into under the Term
49 Sheet that implement the terms of the transactions described in the Term Sheet.
50 Sec. 3. Findings.
51 (a) Poplar Point is owned by the United States and under the jurisdiction of the National
52 Park Service (“NPS”).

53 (b) In 2006, Congress enacted the Federal Act, directing NPS to transfer Poplar Point to
54 the District upon satisfaction by the District of certain requirements set forth in the Federal Act.
55 (c) The Federal Act provides that the District must identify certain NPS facilities that are
56 currently located on Poplar Point (the “NPS Facilities”) and provide for the relocation of those
57 facilities prior to Poplar Point becoming available for development by the District.
58 (d) The Navy has jurisdiction over the Joint Base Anacostia Bolling (“JBAB”).
59 (e) After many years of analysis and review with the District, NPS has determined that
60 Developer 1’s JBAB Property is the only suitable location for the NPS Facilities relocation.
61 (f) Developer 1 has an option to purchase Developer 1’s JBAB Property from the Navy.
62 (g) The Parties will identify Parcel A within Developer 1’s JBAB Property for the
63 relocation of the NPS Facilities from Poplar Point.
64 (h) In order to facilitate the transfer and development of Poplar Point, the Parties desire to
65 engage in a land-swap transaction wherein:
66 (1) Developer 1 will terminate its option with respect to Parcel A;
67 (2) The Navy will transfer jurisdiction over Parcel A to NPS to allow for the
68 construction of the NPS Facilities; and
69 (3) The District will transfer Parcel B to the Navy.
70 (i) The Parties also desire to engage in a separate land-swap transaction wherein:
71 (1) Developer 2 will transfer to the District fee simple title to Parcel 7; and
72 (2) The District will transfer to Developer 2 fee simple title to the Road Swap
73 Parcel.
74 (j) The Transaction Documents shall not be inconsistent with the substantive business
75 terms of the transaction reflected in the Term Sheet, in accordance with section 1(b-1)(2) of the

76 Act, unless revisions to those substantive business terms are approved by the Council in
77 accordance with section 1(b-4) of the Act.
78 Sec. 4. Approval of the disposition of the Properties.
79 (a) Notwithstanding the Act, the Mayor is authorized to dispose of the Road Swap Parcel
80 and Parcel B (collectively, the “Properties”), subject to section 3(j) of this act.
81 (b) The authority of the Mayor to dispose of the Properties pursuant to this act shall
82 expire 10 years after the effective date of this act.
83 Sec. 5. Approval of the acquisition of Parcel 7.
84 (a) The Mayor is authorized to acquire Parcel 7 from Developer 2.
85 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
86 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
87 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
88 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
89 Sec. 7. Effective date.
90 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
91 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
92 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
93 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813, D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
94 Columbia Register.

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OFTHE ATTORNEY GENERAL
*% * *
ATTORNEYGENERAL ay
BRIANL,SCHWALB Ss
(COMMERCIAL DIVISION
TO: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Div:
THROUGH: Charles J. Coughlin enre
Deputy Attorney General
Commercial Division
FROM: Lawrence J. Wolk )
Assistant Attorney General
DATE: September 17, 2026
SUBJECT: JBAB/Poplar Point Land-SwapTerm Sheet signed and dated September 9, 2026 (the
“9/9/26 Term Sheet”) with respect to property located at Poplar Point and more specifically
identified in the 9/9/26 Term Sheet and includingSquare 5860 and Lot 104, by and amongthe
District ofColumbia (the “District”) , RB WNY LLC, and CQ Metro Land LLC underthe Act
authorizing the disposaloftwo parcels ofreal property and the acquisition ofa third parcel at
Poplar Point, submitted to Office ofthe Attorney General alongwith the 9/9/26 Term Sheet. (the
“Land Swap Transaction”)
This is to Certify that the Commercial Division ofthe Officeof the Attorney General has examined
the 9/9/26 Term Sheet provided by theOffice of the Deputy Mayorfor Planning and Economic
Development (“DMPED”). After detailed examination ofthe 9/9/26 Term Sheet,we conclude that it
does not contravene or violate any known legal requirements, obligations, or commitments ofthe
District. Accordingly, as provided to us, we discern no reason to determine thatthe 9/9/26 Term
Sheet is not legally sufficient and it is therefore approved for legal sufficiency.
400 6th Street, NW, Washington, DC 20001 Tel. (202) 724-6658; Lawrence. Wolk@de.gov

The 9/9/26 Term Sheet relating to Poplar Point
Page 2 of2
This Office has notreviewed any transactional documentation other than the 9/9/26 Term Sheet,
This Office provides nolegal opinion about any ofthetransactional documents to be executed
pursuant to the 9/9/26 Term Sheet or otherwise in connection with the Land Swap Transaction,
whether referenced in the 9/9/26 Term Sheet or not so referenced.
Ifyou have any questions, please do not hesitateto contact me at Lawrence.Wolk@de.gov or 202-
236-4654.

Term Sheet
JBAB/Poplar Point Land-Swap
This term sheet (“Term Sheet”) is dated September 9, 2026 and is being executed by (i) the District
of Columbia, acting by and through the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development (“District”), (ii) RB WNY LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (together with
its assigns, “RB WNY”), and (iii) and CQ Metro Land LLC, a Delaware limited liability company
(“Parcel 7 Owner”). Each of District, RB WNY and Parcel 7 Owner are referred to herein as a
“Party” and collectively as the “Parties”.
The purpose of this Term Sheet is to summarize the general terms of the proposed land-swap
transactions among the District, RB WNY, and Parcel 7 Owner and shall not, and is not intended
to, create any legally binding commitment or obligations on any Party.
Background: Pursuant to the Federal and District of Columbia Government Real
Property Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-396, Dec. 15, 2006, 120 Stat.
2711 (the “Act”), the National Park Service (“NPS”) is required to
transfer Poplar Point (as defined in the Act) to the District upon the
satisfaction of certain conditions, which include the certification by
NPS that the District has adopted a land-use plan for Poplar Point
(the “Land Use Plan”).
The Act provides that the Land Use Plan must identify certain NPS
facilities that are currently located on Poplar Point (the “NPS
Facilities”) and provide for the relocation of those facilities prior to
Poplar Point becoming available for development by the District.
The Department of the Navy, by and through the Naval Facilities
Engineering Systems Command Washington (“Navy”), has
jurisdiction over the north parcel of land within Joint Base
Anacostia Bolling (“JBAB”). RB WNY has an option to purchase
from the Navy approximately 32 acres of such north parcel within
JBAB (the “Redbrick Option Property”).
After many years of analysis and review with the District, NPS has
determined that JBAB is their preferred location for the NPS
Facilities relocation.
The Parties will identify a 12-acre portion of the Redbrick Option
Property (“Parcel A”) as the potential location for the relocation of
the NPS Facilities from Poplar Point.
In order to facilitate the transfer and development of Poplar Point,
the Parties desire to structure a land-swap transaction wherein: (1)
RB WNY will terminate its option with respect to Parcel A, (2) Navy
1

will transfer jurisdiction over Parcel A to NPS, and (3) District will
transfer to Navy a portion of Poplar Point (for re-transfer to RB
WNY pursuant to a separate agreement between Navy and RB
WNY). Such portion of Poplar Point shall consist of approximately
12.5 acres generally proximate to the Bridge District (“Parcel B”).
The Parties also desire to structure a separate land-swap transaction
wherein: (1) Parcel 7 Owner will transfer to District fee simple title
to a parcel known as Square 5860, Lot 1041 that allows the District
to construct a new main entry road from Howard Road into Poplar
Point (“Road Parcel”) and (2) District will transfer to Parcel 7
Owner fee simple title to an additional one-half (0.5) acre parcel
within Poplar Point (“Road Swap Parcel”). Parcel 7 Owner and RB
WNY are affiliates of Redbrick LMD (“Redbrick”).
Transfer of Poplar The transfer of Poplar Point from NPS to District will occur in two
Point: parts. The portion of Poplar Point that is occupied and used by NPS
as part of the NPS Facilities shall be referred to herein as “Poplar
Point Part 2”. The remainder of Poplar Point shall be referred to
herein as “Poplar Point Part 1”.
Pursuant to the Act, Poplar Point Part 1 shall be conveyed to District
upon the certification of the Land Use Plan by NPS (the “Land Use
Plan Certification”). Consistent with Section 303(b)(1) of the Act,
the deed from NPS to District conveying Poplar Point Part 1 will
contain a covenant prohibiting construction on Poplar Point Part 1
(the “Development Restriction”) until NPS has certified the NPS
Facilities have been relocated and are ready to be occupied or used
by NPS as provided for in Section 303(a) of the Act (the “Facilities
Certification”).
Upon the occurrence of the Facilities Certification, the
Development Restriction with respect to Poplar Point Part 1 will
automatically terminate, and NPS will convey Poplar Point Part 2 to
District.
Transfer of Parcel A: Upon the satisfaction of the following conditions, RB WNY shall
terminate all of its rights and interest in Parcel A to permit the Navy
to complete a Transfer of Administrative Jurisdiction pursuant to 40
U.S.C. § 8124 to transfer Parcel A to NPS:
1) Completion of the Land Use Plan Certification and the
transfer of Poplar Point Part 1 by NPS to District;
2) Transfer of Parcel B (simultaneously with the transfer of
Parcel A) by District to Navy as described below;
2

3) NPS has approved plans for the NPS Facilities and entered
into an agreement with District with respect to NPS’s
approval and acceptance of the construction;
4) Confirmation from District that it has funds available in its
budget to fund the construction of the NPS Facilities; and
5) District has obtained the necessary permits and approvals
and is ready to commence construction of the NPS Facilities.
Transfer of Parcel B: The transfer of Parcel B by District to Navy will be subject to the
following conditions:
1) District has authority pursuant to legislation by the Council
of the District of Columbia (“Council”) approving the
transfer, notwithstanding the requirements of D.C. Official
Code § 10-801 (“Transfer Legislation”);
2) The deed from District conveying Parcel B to Navy will be
subject to the Development Restriction until the Facilities
Certification;
3) Transfer of Parcel A (simultaneously with the transfer of
Parcel B) by Navy to NPS as described above; and
4) Compliance with the Land Use Plan.
Road Land Swap: The exchange of the Road Parcel and Road Swap Parcel between
Parcel 7 Owner and District will be subject to the following
conditions:
1) District has authority pursuant to legislation by the Council
approving the exchange, notwithstanding the requirements
of D.C. Official Code § 10-801 (“Swap Legislation”);
2) The deed from District conveying the Road Swap Parcel to
Parcel 7 Owner will be subject to the Development
Restriction until the Facilities Certification;
3) Compliance with the Land Use Plan; and
4) District and Parcel 7 Owner and/or another affiliate of
Redbrick which owns property adjacent to the Road Parcel
have entered into an agreement that (i) provides for District
and such Redbrick affiliate to coordinate the design and
construction of the improvements on the adjacent property
to align with the design and construction of the proposed
street on the Road Parcel, and (ii) provides for construction
by District of access (curb cut, gutter, etc.) from the
proposed road to such adjacent property.
Outside Dates for If the Parties have not closed on the transfers of Parcel A and Parcel
Closing B prior to June 30, 2029, Redbrick may elect to 1) extend the outside
closing date so long as such extension does not extend beyond the
3

expiration of the Transfer Legislation or 2) terminate the agreements
memorializing the land swap described herein. If the Parties have
not closed on the transfers of the Road Parcel and Road Swap Parcel
prior to June 30, 2030, Redbrick may elect to 1) extend the outside
closing date so long as such extension does not extend beyond the
expiration of the Swap Legislation or 2) terminate the agreements
memorializing such exchange.
Further The Parties will work in good faith to develop final documents
Documentation: memorializing their agreement with respect the land transfers,
infrastructure, and specific locations of the parcels described herein.
[signatures on following page]
4

The Parties have caused thisTerm Sheet tobeexecuted by their duly authorized
representatives as ofthe date identified above.
DISTRICTOF COLUMBIA
By and through theOffice ofthe Deputy Mayor for
Planningand EconomicAevelopment
By:
Deputy Mayor
RB WNY LLC, a Delaware limited liability
company
yO ASCe
Name: Tom Skinner
Title:
CQ METRO LAND LLC, a Delaware limited
liability company
By:oe —
‘Name: Tom Skinner
Title:

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Legal Counsel Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 23, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Poplar Point Acquisition and Disposition Approval
Act of 2026”
(AE-26-385)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 25, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Poplar Point Acquisition and Dispositiuon
Approval Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September 9,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and the fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The District’s Capital Improvements Plan
includes over $28 million to complete the design of new National Park Service (NPS) facilities, whose
relocation is the first step in finalizing several land transfers in and around Poplar Point.
Background
In 2006 Congress required NPS to transfer Poplar Point to the District subject to an approved land-
use plan.1 Poplar Point is federally owned land located along the Anacostia River between the
Frederick Douglass Memorial Bridge and the 11th Street Bridge. Poplar Point contains parkland and
NPS operational facilities.
The bill authorizes the Mayor to dispose of certain Poplar Point parcels and acquire other property
through various land swaps with federal partners and developers, consistent with the proposed
terms of the transaction and the land-use plan. As part of the transaction, the District must relocate
the NPS facilities on Poplar Point. NPS has determined that the best location for these facilities is west
of South Capitol Street, S.E. along the Anacostia River, on property currently owned by the Navy as
1 Federal and District of Columbia Real Property Act of 2006, effective December 15, 2006 (Public Law 109-
396; 120 Stat. 2711).
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Poplar Point Acquisition and Disposition Approval Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of
Revenue Analysis on September 9, 2026
part of Joint Base Anacostia-Bolling (JBAB). However, a private developer, RB WNY LLC, has the right
to acquire 32 acres of land located on the northern part of JBAB, including the desired land for the
relocation of NPS facilities. To facilitate the relocation, the developer will relinquish their right to
acquire twelve of the 32 acres of JBAB land. In exchange for the developer relinquishing its rights, the
District will transfer control of twelve acres of the land it receives at Poplar Point from the federal
government to the Navy, who will then transfer it to the developer through a separate agreement.
In addition to the above transactions, the bill authorizes the District to complete a land swap with a
second developer, CQ Metro Land LLC, who owns a parcel of land along Howard Road, S.E.,2 just north
of Interstate 295. The District will give CQ Metro Land LLC a 0.5 acre parcel on Poplar Point in
exchange for the land. The District is executing this land swap to accommodate the construction of
an access roadway from Howard Road, S.E. into Poplar Point. RB WNY LLC and CQ Metro Land LLC
are affiliated developers known collectively as Redbrick LMD.
The District must first have the land-use plan approved by NPS, and any development at Poplar Point
will be restricted until the District constructs the new NPS facilities on the formerly JBAB land and
they are ready to be occupied.
The bill sunsets the Mayor’s authority to dispose of any properties to the Navy or CQ Metro Land LLC
ten years after the bill’s effective date. Despite the bill’s sunset date, the terms of the transaction
require the land transactions that have RB WNY LLC relinquishing its rights to twelve acres of the
JBAB land and the District transferring twelve acres to the Navy for RB WNY LLC to close by June 30,
2029,3 unless otherwise extended by the Redbrick development team. The terms also require the
District to complete the land swap with CQ Metro Land LLC by June 30, 2030, unless otherwise
extended by the Redbrick development team.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The bill authorizes the disposal of a 12.5-acre
parcel of the land it receives from NPS as part of the Poplar Point transfer to facilitate the
development of new NPS facilities and a land swap with a private developer to construct an access
road to Poplar Point. The lynchpin in the term sheet to transfer ownership of the various parcels of
land on Poplar Point and JBAB is the District designing and constructing new facilities for NPS
operations. The District’s 6-year Capital Improvements Plan contains over $28 million through fiscal
year 2029 to complete environmental assessments at Poplar Point and design the NPS facilities. The
District’s budget does not include funding for the construction of the NPS facilities, but the extent of
that fiscal need will not be known until the design activities are complete.
2 This land is known for assessment and tax purposes as Square 5860, Lot 1041.
3 The District must also show that it has approved plans and funding to construct the relocated NPS facilities.
Page 2 of 2